Ohio, session 136, HB488.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 993.15 and 993.16 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 993.15. (A) As used in this section and section 993.16 of the Revised Code: (1) "Amusement park" means a fixed-site amusement facility open to the public for a defined or seasonal period each year that contains amusement rides that are inspected by the department of agriculture under this chapter. (2) "Ride status" means the operational condition of an amusement ride at any given time. (3) "Real-time" means within five minutes of a change in an amusement ride's operational status. (B)(1) An owner or operator of an amusement park shall implement and maintain a system that publicly communicates the real-time ride status of each amusement ride on the park's premises during the park's operating hours. Such ride status shall specify one of the following: (a) That the amusement ride is operational to indicate that the ride is open and functioning; (b) That the amusement ride is temporarily closed to indicate that the ride is not operating due to mechanical issues, weather, staffing issues, or other temporary causes; (c) That the amusement ride is under maintenance to indicate that the ride is closed for mechanical work or inspection; (d) Any other ride status that specifies that the amusement ride is closed and clearly indicates the reason for such closure. (2) The owner or operator, when implementing and maintaining a real-time ride status communication system, shall ensure that the public may access the ride status of each amusement ride on the amusement park's premise, at a minimum, by doing both of the following: (a) Installing and maintaining digital signage that depicts the ride status of each such amusement ride at or near the entrance to the amusement park and at the entrance of each amusement ride; (b) Displaying the ride status of each such amusement ride on the amusement park's web site, any social media platforms, and any mobile application maintained by the owners or operators of the amusement park. Such signage and electronic displays shall be updated in real-time to reflect an amusement ride's ride status. (C) No owner or operator of an amusement park shall violate division (B) of this section or rules adopted under section 993.16 of the Revised Code. (D) Whoever violates division (C) of this section is subject to the following administrative penalties: (1) A warning for a first violation; (2) A civil fine of ten thousand dollars per day for each subsequent violation; (3) Any additional corrective actions specified in rules adopted under section 993.16 of the Revised Code. Sec. 993.16. Not later than one hundred eighty days after the effective date of this section, the director of agriculture shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement and enforce section 993.15 of the Revised Code, including provisions for inspections and compliance monitoring. Section 2. Section 993.15 of the Revised Code takes effect one year after the effective date of this section.